Indiana, session 2026, SB134.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 9-13-2-2.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 2.1. "Agent", for purposes of IC 9-21-23, has the
meaning set forth in IC 9-21-23-1.
SECTION 2. IC 9-13-2-110.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 110.7. "Municipality", for
purposes of IC 9-21-23, has the meaning set forth in IC 9-21-23-4.
SECTION 3. IC 9-13-2-121, AS AMENDED BY P.L.164-2020,
SECTION 32, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 121. (a) Except as otherwise provided in
subsection subsections (b) and (c), "owner" means a person, other than
a lienholder, that:
(1) holds the property in or title to, as applicable, a vehicle,
manufactured home, mobile home, off-road vehicle, snowmobile,
or watercraft; or
(2) is entitled to the use or possession of, as applicable, a vehicle,
2026 IN 134—LS 6269/DI 151


manufactured home, off-road vehicle, snowmobile, or watercraft,
through a lease or other agreement intended to operate as a
security.
(b) "Owner" for purposes of IC 9-18.1-14.5, has the meaning set
forth in 33 CFR 174.3.
(c) "Owner", for purposes of IC 9-21-23, has the meaning set
forth in IC 9-21-23-5.
SECTION 4. IC 9-13-2-161.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 161.6. "School zone speed control
system", for purposes of IC 9-21-23, has the meaning set forth in
IC 9-21-23-6.
SECTION 5. IC 9-14-13-7, AS ADDED BY P.L.198-2016,
SECTION 193, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. The bureau may disclose certain
personal information that is not highly restricted personal information
if the person requesting the information provides proof of identity and
represents that the use of the personal information will be strictly
limited to at least one (1) of the following:
(1) For use by a government agency, including a court or law
enforcement agency, in carrying out its functions, or a person
acting on behalf of a government agency in carrying out its
functions, including an agent in carrying out its
responsibilities under IC 9-21-23.
(2) For use in connection with matters concerning:
(A) motor vehicle or driver safety and theft;
(B) motor vehicle emissions;
(C) motor vehicle product alterations, recalls, or advisories;
(D) performance monitoring of motor vehicles, motor vehicle
parts, and dealers;
(E) motor vehicle market research activities, including survey
research;
(F) the removal of nonowner records from the original owner
records of motor vehicle manufacturers; and
(G) motor fuel theft under IC 24-4.6-5.
(3) For use in the normal course of business by a business or its
agents, employees, or contractors, but only:
(A) to verify the accuracy of personal information submitted
by an individual to the business or its agents, employees, or
contractors; and
(B) if information submitted to a business is not correct or is
no longer correct, to obtain the correct information only for
2026 IN 134—LS 6269/DI 151


purposes of preventing fraud by pursuing legal remedies
against, or recovering on a debt or security interest against, the
individual.
(4) For use in connection with a civil, a criminal, an
administrative, or an arbitration proceeding in a court or
government agency or before a self-regulatory body, including the
service of process, investigation in anticipation of litigation, and
the execution or enforcement of judgments and orders, or under
an order of a court.
(5) For use in research activities, and for use in producing
statistical reports, as long as the personal information is not
published, redisclosed, or used to contact the individuals who are
the subject of the personal information.
(6) For use by an insurer, an insurance support organization, or a
self-insured entity, or the agents, employees, or contractors of an
insurer, an insurance support organization, or a self-insured entity
in connection with claims investigation activities, anti-fraud
activities, rating, or underwriting.
(7) For use in providing notice to the owners of towed or
impounded vehicles.
(8) For use by a licensed private investigative agency or licensed
security service for a purpose allowed under this section.
(9) For use by an employer or its agent or insurer to obtain or
verify information relating to a holder of a commercial driver's
license that is required under the Commercial Motor Vehicle
Safety Act of 1986 (49 U.S.C. 31131 et seq.).
(10) For use in connection with the operation of private toll
transportation facilities.
(11) For any use in response to requests for individual motor
vehicle records when the bureau has obtained the written consent
of the person to whom the personal information pertains.
(12) For bulk distribution for surveys, marketing, or solicitations
when the bureau has obtained the written consent of the person to
whom the personal information pertains.
(13) For use by any person, when the person demonstrates, in a
form and manner prescribed by the bureau, that written consent
has been obtained from the individual who is the subject of the
information.
(14) For any other use specifically authorized by law that is
related to the operation of a motor vehicle or public safety.
However, this section does not affect the use of anatomical gift
information on a person's driver's license or identification document
2026 IN 134—LS 6269/DI 151


issued by the bureau, nor does this section affect the administration of
anatomical gift initiatives in Indiana.
SECTION 6. IC 9-21-5-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.49-2024,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) Except as provided in subsections (e) and
(f), whenever a local authority in the authority's jurisdiction determines
that the maximum speed permitted under this chapter is greater or less
than reasonable and safe under the conditions found to exist on a
highway or part of a highway, the local authority may determine and
declare a reasonable and safe maximum limit on the highway. The
maximum limit declared under this section may do any of the
following:
(1) Decrease the limit within urban districts, but not to less than
twenty (20) miles per hour.
(2) Increase the limit within an urban district, but not to more than
fifty-five (55) miles per hour during daytime and fifty (50) miles
per hour during nighttime.
(3) Decrease the limit outside an urban district, but not to less
than thirty (30) miles per hour.
(4) Decrease the limit in an alley, but to not less than five (5)
miles per hour.
(5) Increase the limit in an alley, but to not more than twenty (20)
miles per hour.
The local authority must perform an engineering and traffic
investigation before a determination may be made to change a speed
limit under subdivision (2), (3), (4), or (5) or before the speed limit on
a highway with a functional classification of arterial or major collector
within an urban district may be decreased to less than twenty-five (25)
miles per hour under subdivision (1). An engineering and traffic
investigation is not required to decrease the speed limit to twenty (20)
miles per hour on a highway with a functional classification of minor
collector or local road in an urban district.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (f), a local authority in the
authority's jurisdiction shall determine by an engineering and traffic
investigation the proper maximum speed for all local streets and shall
declare a reasonable and safe maximum speed permitted under this
chapter for an urban district. However, an engineering and traffic study
is not required to be performed for the local streets in an urban district
under this subsection if the local authority determines that the proper
maximum speed in the urban district is not less than twenty-five (25)
miles per hour.
(c) An altered limit established under this section is effective at all
2026 IN 134—LS 6269/DI 151


times or during hours of darkness or at other times as may be
determined when appropriate signs giving notice of the altered limit are
erected on the street or highway.
(d) Except as provided in this subsection and notwithstanding
IC 9-21-23 or IC 36-1-3-8(a), a local authority may not alter a speed
limit on a highway or extension of a highway in the state highway
system. A city or town may establish speed limits on state highways
upon which a school is located. However, a speed limit established
under this subsection is valid only if the following conditions exist:
(1) The limit is not less than twenty (20) miles per hour.
(2) The limit is imposed only in the immediate vicinity of the
school.
(3) Children are present.
(4) The speed zone is properly signed. There must be:
(A) a sign located:
(i) where the reduced speed zone begins; or
(ii) as near as practical to the point where the reduced speed
zone begins;
indicating the reduced speed limit; and
(B) a sign located at the end of the reduced speed zone
indicating:
(i) the speed limit for the section of highway that follows; or
(ii) the end of the reduced speed zone.
(5) The Indiana department of transportation has been notified of
the limit imposed by certified mail.
(e) A local authority may decrease a limit on a street to not less than
fifteen (15) miles per hour if the following conditions exist:
(1) The street is located within a park or playground established
under IC 36-10.
(2) The:
(A) board established under IC 36-10-3;
(B) board established under IC 36-10-4; or
(C) park authority established under IC 36-10-5;
requests the local authority to decrease the limit.
(3) The speed zone is properly signed.
(f) A city, town, or county may establish speed limits on a street or
highway upon which a school is located if the street or highway is
under the jurisdiction of the city, town, or county, respectively.
However, a speed limit established under this subsection is valid only
if the following conditions exist:
(1) The limit is not less than twenty (20) miles per hour.
(2) The limit is imposed only in the immediate vicinity of the
2026 IN 134—LS 6269/DI 151


school.
(3) Children are present.
(4) The speed zone is properly signed. There must be:
(A) a sign located where the reduced speed zone begins or as
near as practical to the point where the reduced speed zone
begins indicating the reduced speed limit and a sign located at
the end of the reduced speed zone indicating the end of the
reduced speed zone; and
(B) if the school operates on a twelve (12) month schedule, a
sign indicating that the school is an all year school.
Notwithstanding IC 36-1-3-8(a), a city, town, or county may
establish speed limits on a street or highway upon which a school
is located if the street or highway is under the jurisdiction of the
city, town, or county, respectively, under IC 9-21-23.
(g) Except as provided in subsection (h), a person who exceeds a
speed limit established by a local authority under this section commits
a Class C infraction.
(h) A person who exceeds a speed limit that is established under
subsection (d) or (f) commits a Class B infraction.
SECTION 7. IC 9-21-23 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 23. School Zone Speed Control Program
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "agent" means a person that:
(1) provides services to a county or municipality;
(2) operates, maintains, leases, or licenses school zone speed
control systems as authorized by a county or municipality; or
(3) is authorized to review and assemble a recorded image
captured by a school zone speed control system for review by
a police officer employed by a county or municipality.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "motor vehicle" has the meaning
set forth in IC 9-13-2-105(a).
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "motor vehicle rental company"
means a person that routinely engages in the business of renting
motor vehicles for periods of not more than thirty (30) days.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "municipality" has the meaning
set forth in IC 36-1-2-11.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "owner" means a person in
whose name a motor vehicle is registered under any of the
following:
(1) IC 9-18.1.
(2) The law of another state.
2026 IN 134—LS 6269/DI 151


(3) The law of a foreign country.
(4) The International Registration Plan.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "school zone speed control
system" means a photographic device, radar device, laser device,
or another electrical or mechanical device or devices designed to:
(1) record the speed of a motor vehicle;
(2) obtain a clear photograph or other recorded image of the
rear of the motor vehicle and the license plate affixed to the
motor vehicle at the time the recorded speed of the motor
vehicle exceeds a school zone speed limit;
(3) indicate on at least one (1) recorded image the date, time,
and location of the violation of a school zone speed limit; and
(4) undergo an annual calibration check, the results of which
are kept on file with the county or municipality that uses the
school zone speed control system.
Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "school zone speed limit" means
a speed limit established under IC 9-21-5-6.
Sec. 8. (a) Notwithstanding IC 36-1-3-8(a)(8), a county or
municipality may adopt an ordinance to use a school zone speed
control system to enforce a violation of a school zone speed limit.
(b) An ordinance adopted under subsection (a) must be adopted
as follows:
(1) In a municipality, by the legislative body of the
municipality.
(2) In a county subject to IC 36-2-3.5 or IC 36-3-1, by the
legislative body of the county.
(3) In any other county, by the executive of the county.
(c) An ordinance adopted under subsection (a) is subject to an
interlocal agreement under IC 36-1-7.
Sec. 9.(a) A municipality, county, or school corporation that
uses a school zone speed control system may enter into a contract
with an agent for the installation, operation, notice processing,
administration, and maintenance of the school zone speed control
system.
(b) An agent is not required to be licensed under IC 25-30-1.
(c) The records, documents, and books kept by an agent are not
considered public records (as defined in IC 5-14-3-2(r)).
Sec. 10. A county or municipality may adopt an ordinance to
establish a school zone speed limit under IC 9-21-5-6 that is
enforced by a school zone speed control system.
Sec. 11. (a) If a county or municipality adopts an ordinance
under section 8 of this chapter, the ordinance must include the
2026 IN 134—LS 6269/DI 151


following regarding the school zone speed control system:
(1) That the school zone speed control system is maintained in
accordance with specified self-test performance standards.
(2) That an ordinance adopted under this chapter may be
challenged pursuant to the requirements of IC 34-13-6.
(b) If a county or municipality adopts an ordinance under
section 8 of this chapter, the ordinance must include the following
regarding a violation:
(1) That a police officer employed by the county or
municipality:
(A) must review and approve an image recorded by the
school zone speed control system before notice of an
ordinance violation may be forwarded to the owner of the
motor vehicle; and
(B) may not forward notice of an ordinance violation to an
owner under clause (A) if, in the opinion of the police
officer, it was not possible for the operator of the motor
vehicle to safely avoid committing the ordinance violation
due to inclement weather conditions.
(2) Except as otherwise provided under this chapter, that the
owner of a motor vehicle identified through a school zone
speed control system is liable for the civil penalty for a
violation under this chapter.
(3) The defenses to a violation under section 17 of this
chapter.
(4) The civil penalty to be assessed for a violation under
section 18 of this chapter.
(5) That an owner may pay a civil penalty for a violation by
electronic means.
(6) That a county or municipality may bring an action under
IC 36-1-6 to enforce an ordinance or action taken under this
chapter.
(c) A county or municipality that adopts an ordinance under
section 8 of this chapter shall publish notice of the location of each
school zone speed control system on the website of the county or
municipality.
Sec. 12. (a) A school corporation that uses a school zone speed
control system to enforce an ordinance adopted under this chapter
must forward a recorded image produced by the school zone speed
control system to the law enforcement agency of the county or
municipality in which the school corporation is located for review
and approval by a police officer employed by the law enforcement
2026 IN 134—LS 6269/DI 151


agency before notice of the ordinance violation may be sent to the
owner of the motor vehicle.
(b) A police officer described in subsection (a) may not send
notice of the ordinance violation to the owner of the motor vehicle
if, in the opinion of the police officer, the operator of the motor
vehicle could not have safely avoided committing the ordinance
violation due to inclement weather conditions.
Sec. 13. Before installing a school zone speed control system, a
county or municipality shall:
(1) conduct a public information campaign to inform drivers
about the use of a school zone speed control system to detect
speeds in excess of a school zone speed limit; and
(2) post signs indicating that school zone speed limits are
monitored by a school zone speed control system before the
entrance to a school zone in which a school zone speed control
system is in use.
Sec. 14. (a) A school zone speed control system must undergo an
annual calibration check performed by an independent calibration
laboratory.
(b) The independent calibration laboratory performing the
annual calibration check required under subsection (a) shall issue
a certificate of calibration to the Indiana department of
transportation for the school zone speed control system as proof
that:
(1) the annual calibration check was performed; and
(2) the school zone speed control system is accurately
calibrated.
Sec. 15. (a) A school zone speed control system may not be used
to take a photograph or recorded image of the front of a motor
vehicle.
(b) A photograph or recorded image of the front of a motor
vehicle obtained through the use of a school zone speed control
system may not be used as evidence of a violation under this
chapter.
(c) The information, photographs, and recorded images
collected under this chapter are confidential under IC 5-14-3.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in this section, information,
photographs, or recorded images collected under this chapter are
not discoverable by court order as evidence in a proceeding except
to assess a penalty under section 18 of this chapter.
(e) Information, photographs, or recorded images collected
under this chapter must be destroyed not later than two (2) years
2026 IN 134—LS 6269/DI 151


after the date the information, photographs, or recorded images
are collected.
(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, information,
photographs, or recorded images collected by a school zone speed
control system are the exclusive property of the state of Indiana
and not the property of the manufacturer or vendor of the school
zone speed control system.
Sec. 16. (a) Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, use of
a photograph or recorded image obtained through the use of a
school zone speed control system for the purpose of enforcing a
traffic offense (as defined in IC 9-13-2-183) is prohibited.
(b) A photograph or recorded image obtained through the use
of a school zone speed control system may not be used as evidence
in any action other than the action to collect a school zone speed
limit civil penalty for which the photograph or recorded image was
obtained.
(c) Unless authorized by court order, a photograph or recorded
image obtained through the use of a school zone speed control
system may not be disclosed to anyone other than:
(1) the owner of the motor vehicle at the time the recorded
speed of the motor vehicle exceeded a school zone speed limit;
(2) an individual alleged to have been operating the motor
vehicle at the time the school zone speed limit was exceeded as
described in subdivision (1);
(3) an attorney representing an individual described in
subdivision (1) or (2);
(4) a law enforcement officer;
(5) the Indiana department of transportation;
(6) a person administering the school zone speed control
system; and
(7) the court in a proceeding for judicial review under
IC 4-21.5.
Sec. 17. (a) Except as provided in subsection (d), the owner of a
motor vehicle identified through a school zone speed control system
is liable for the civil penalty described in section 18 of this chapter
for exceeding a school zone speed limit.
(b) There is a rebuttable presumption that the owner of a motor
vehicle that is the subject of a photograph or recorded image was
operating the motor vehicle when the photograph or recorded
image was obtained through a school zone speed control system.
(c) The presumption under subsection (b) does not apply to an
owner that is a motor vehicle rental company.
2026 IN 134—LS 6269/DI 151


(d) The owner of a motor vehicle may submit information to
rebut the presumption created by subsection (b).
(e) It is a defense under this section if any of the following apply:
(1) The person receiving a notice of violation issued under this
chapter:
(A) was not the owner of the motor vehicle; or
(B) was not operating the motor vehicle;
at the time that the school zone speed limit was exceeded.
(2) The motor vehicle was reported stolen prior to the time
that the school zone speed limit was exceeded and was not
recovered prior to that time.
(3) The school zone speed control system was not properly
tested for accuracy, certification, or calibration.
Sec. 18. (a) Notwithstanding IC 36-1-3-8(a)(10)(B), a person who
exceeds a school zone speed limit which is detected under this
chapter is subject to the following civil penalties:
(1) A written warning for the first violation.
(2) A civil penalty of seventy-five dollars ($75) for the second
violation.
(3) A civil penalty of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) for the
third and each subsequent violation.
(b) A county or municipality may impose a fee associated with
the electronic processing of the civil penalty imposed under
subsection (a).
(c) A county or municipality must apply at least fifty percent
(50%) of the amount of the civil penalty imposed under subsection
(a) to defray the cost to install, operate, and maintain a school zone
speed control system.
(d) The remaining money from the civil penalty imposed under
subsection (a) must be transferred to the general fund of the county
or municipality to be used for public safety and infrastructure.
Sec. 19. (a) Not later than November 1 of each year, each county
and municipality that uses a school zone speed control system
under this chapter shall submit a report to the interim study
committee on roads and transportation established by IC 2-5-1.3-4
that includes the following:
(1) The number of ordinance violation notices issued in a
school zone where a school zone speed control system was
operated.
(2) The amount of fines imposed for violations occurring in a
school zone where a school zone speed control system was
operated.
2026 IN 134—LS 6269/DI 151


(b) A report under this section must be submitted in an
electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
SECTION 8. IC 9-30-3-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.111-2021,
SECTION 87, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. This section does not apply to a violation of
an ordinance adopted under IC 9-21-23. If a court convicts a person
for a moving traffic offense and the person is known or believed by the
court not to be the owner of the motor vehicle, the court shall, within
seven (7) days after entering the conviction, deposit with the United
States Postal Service, first class postage prepaid, notice addressed to
the owner of the motor vehicle giving the owner the following
information:
(1) The name and address of the person convicted.
(2) The name and address of the owner of the motor vehicle.
(3) The offense upon which the conviction was made.
(4) The date of arrest of the person convicted and the location of
the place of the offense.
(5) The license plate number of the motor vehicle.
(6) The driver's or chauffeur's license number of the person
convicted.
(7) The date of the conviction and the name of the court making
the conviction.
SECTION 9. IC 34-6-2.1-129, AS ADDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 176, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 129. "Moving traffic violation", for
purposes of IC 34-28-5, means a violation of:
(1) a statute defining an infraction; or
(2) an ordinance, other than a violation under IC 9-21-23;
that applies when a motor vehicle is in motion.
SECTION 10. IC 36-1-6-3 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Certain
ordinances may be enforced by a municipal corporation without
proceeding in court through:
(1) an admission of violation before the violations clerk under
IC 33-36; or
(2) administrative enforcement under section 9 of this chapter.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (a), a proceeding to enforce an
ordinance must be brought in accordance with IC 34-28-5, section 4 of
this chapter, or both.
(c) An ordinance defining a moving traffic violation may not be
enforced under IC 33-36 and must be enforced in accordance with
IC 34-28-5.
2026 IN 134—LS 6269/DI 151


(d) An ordinance adopted under IC 9-21-23 may be enforced
under IC 33-36 or IC 34-28-5.
2026 IN 134—LS 6269/DI 151